California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 completion, participant demographics, and participation by regional center and type of service provider.

(2) Number of new hires at service providers and regional centers.

(3) Employee retention and turnover rates at service providers and regional centers overall and among the program participant population, including available baseline rates prior to implementation of the programs and rates following completion of the programs.

(4) Consumer and family satisfaction and other measures of consumer outcomes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 28.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4699.7.

(a) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific, the provisions of this chapter by means of written directives or similar instructions through June 30, 2025.

(b) Contracts to procure services to implement this chapter shall be exempt from the requirements contained in the Public Contract Code and the State Administrative Manual and from approval by the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 28.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Appeal Procedure [4700. - 4731.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [4700. - 4702.]

4700.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 30.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4701.

(a) “Adequate notice” means a written notice using the form prescribed by the department. The notice shall be in plain, clear, and nontechnical language. The notice shall be provided in the language preferred by the recipient or applicant receiving the notice, and, if appropriate, the authorized representative. The notice shall be sent to the recipient or applicant and, if appropriate, their authorized representative, as specified in Section 4710. The notice shall provide the following information:

(1) The action that the regional center or state-operated facility proposes to take, including a statement of the facts upon which the regional center or state-operated facility is relying.

(2) The reason or reasons for that action.

(3) The effective date of that action.

(4) The specific provision or provisions of law, regulation, or policy supporting the action.

(5) Information on availability of advocacy assistance, including referral to the clients’ rights advocates specified in Sections 4433 and 4433.5, the State Council on Developmental Disabilities, publicly funded legal services organizations, and other advocacy organizations, including the agency designated as the protection and advocacy system as required under the Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6000 et seq.) and as provided in Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 4900).

(6) A statement indicating whether the
 recipient is a participant in the Medicaid home and community-based services waiver.

(7) Information about how to file an appeal with the department, unless the department has designated another agency to receive appeal requests, and the contact information for the department.

(8) Information about the following rights that are available at all steps in the appeals process:

(A) To have an interpreter provide interpretation in the preferred language of the applicant or recipient and, if appropriate, the preferred language of the authorized representative.

(B) Access to records, including all records maintained in the individual’s regional center or state-operated facility file, pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 4725).

(9) Information about the following rights if a fair hearing is requested:

(A) The opportunity to attend and participate in all proceedings and to present written and oral evidence.

(B) The opportunity to examine and cross-examine witnesses.

(C) The right to appear in person with counsel or other representatives of their own choosing.

(D) The fair hearing shall be completed and a final administrative decision rendered within 90 days of the date the hearing request form is received by the department unless the fair hearing request has been withdrawn or the time period has been extended in accordance with this chapter.

(E) The
 right to request the disqualification of the hearing officer by filing an affidavit or making an objection on the record as specified in subdivision (g) of Section 4712. The information required by this subparagraph shall be included in the notice required by this paragraph no later than October 1, 2022.

(10) Information about the appeals process and timelines, including when current services are continued during the appeals process, and when a claimant can request a continuance.

(11) (A) Whether or not the individual is eligible for an exemption or exception to the action the regional center proposes to take as specified in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 4648, subdivision (d) of Section 4648.35, subdivision (d) of Section 4659, subdivision (i) of Section 4689, and subdivisions (a) and (d) of Section 4689.05, subdivision (b)
 of Section 95004 of the Government Code, and paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 95020 of the Government Code.

(B) The specific law supporting any of the above-specified exemptions or exceptions.

(b) “Appeal request form” means a form prescribed by the department that includes the name, address, contact information, and birth date of the claimant, date of the appeal request, the name of the regional center that provides services to the claimant or where an applicant has applied for services, the reason an appeal is requested, and the name, address, and relationship to the claimant of the authorized representative, if any. The appeal request form shall also indicate whether the claimant or their authorized representative is requesting an informal meeting, a mediation, or a fair hearing, or any combination of these options. A copy of the appointment of the authorized
 representative, by the claimant or the State Council on Developmental Disabilities if any, shall also be included. The form shall provide information about how to file an appeal and contact information for filing the appeal request form with the department unless the department has designated a different agency to receive the form.

(c) “Applicant” means a person who has applied for services from a regional center, or on whose behalf services have been applied for.

(d) (1) “Authorized representative” means any conservator, or legal guardian, parent, or person having legal custody of a minor claimant, who acts for or represents the claimant or a person or agency appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4541 or subdivision (d) of Section 4705 and authorized in writing by the claimant or by the legal guardian, conservator, or parent or person having legal
 custody of a minor claimant to act for or represent the claimant under this chapter.

(2) “Authorized representative” also means any responsible adult appointed by a court order made pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 319, subdivision (a) of Section 361, or subdivision (b) of Section 726 who the court determines is an appropriate representative for the minor, and who does not have a conflict of interest, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 7579.5 of the Government Code, including, but not limited to, a foster parent, caregiver, or court-appointed special advocate.

(e) “Business days” means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, or any other day that is an observed state or federal holiday.

(f) “Claimant” means an applicant for or recipient of services who has filed an appeal.

(g) “Days” means calendar days.

(h) “Hearing office” means the state agency that the department has designated to provide mediation and administrative hearing services.

(i) “Interpreter” means an individual who is able to interpret effectively, accurately, and impartially, both receptively and expressively.

(j) “Medicaid home and community-based services waiver participant” means an individual deemed eligible and receiving services through a Medicaid home and community-based services waiver program.

(k) “Mutual consent” means that the recipient or, if appropriate, their authorized representative, agrees with a regional center’s or state operated facility’s proposal to reduce, terminate, or
 change the services specified in an individual program plan or to deny the initiation of a service or support requested for inclusion in the individual program plan and that agreement is affirmatively documented, subsequent to the regional center’s proposal or denial, in a signed individual program plan, a signed list of services pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 4646, or other written communication from a recipient or authorized representative affirmatively agreeing to all or part of the regional center’s or state-approved facility’s proposal or denial.

(1) In the absence of written documentation, if the regional center or state-operated facility has a good faith belief that an agreement exists, it shall, within five business days of the agreement, send a letter confirming the agreement to the recipient and, if appropriate, their authorized representative, if any, by standard mail, certified mail, or email at their preference as indicated
 in their individual program plan. The letter shall include at least all of the following:

(A) The factual basis for the regional center’s or state-operated facility’s good faith belief that an agreement exists to reduce, terminate, or change the services specified in an individual program plan or to deny the initiation of a service or support requested for inclusion in the individual program plan.

(B) The action the service agency intends to take.

(C) The reason or reasons for that action.

(D) The availability of an appeals process if the applicant, recipient, or authorized representative disagrees with the decision and a link to the department’s internet website with information about the appeals process.

(E) Information about how to express disagreement with the decision and how to obtain additional information about the appeals process.

(F) An appeal request form as described in subdivision (b).

(2) If the regional center is informed that the recipient or, if appropriate, their authorized representative, disagrees with its decision, the regional center shall immediately send adequate notice as defined in subdivision (a).

(3) This subdivision shall become operative on March 1, 2023.

(l) “Persons who have the right to request an appeal” means an applicant, recipient, and those individuals defined in subdivision (d).

(m) “Preferred
 language” means the language chosen by the applicant or recipient, and if applicable, the authorized representative.

(n) “Recipient” means a person with a developmental disability who receives services from a regional center or a state-operated facility.

(o) “Services” means the type and amount of services and services components set forth in the recipient’s individual program plan pursuant to Section 4646, and provided by a regional center or by the department at a state-operated facility.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 30.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4702.

Each regional center and each vendor that contracts with a regional center to provide services to recipients shall conspicuously post on its internet web, if any, links to the department’s internet website page that provides a description of the appeals process set forth in this chapter and department contact information for providing information and education to recipients and applicants about the appeals process, including the notice of proposed action, timelines, options for resolving disagreements, and rights during the appeals process.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 30.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [4705. - 4708.]

4705.

Every regional center or state-operated facility shall, as a condition of continued receipt of state funds, have an appeals procedure for resolving conflicts between the regional center or state-operated facility and recipients of, or applicants for, service. The State Department of Developmental Services shall promulgate regulations to implement this chapter, which shall be binding on every regional center or state-operated facility.

(a) (1) Any public or private agency receiving state funds for the purpose of serving persons with developmental disabilities not otherwise subject to the provisions of this chapter shall, as a condition of continued receipt of state funds, adopt and periodically review a written internal grievance procedure.

(b) An agency that employs an appeals procedure mandated by any other statute shall be considered to have an approved procedure for purposes of this chapter.

(c) (1) The regional center’s and the state-operated facility’s appeals procedures for informal meetings, mediations, and fair hearings shall be stated in writing, in English and any other language that may be appropriate to the preferred language of the applicants and recipients served by the regional center or the state-operated facility.

(2) All recipients and applicants, and persons having legal responsibility for recipients or applicants, shall be informed verbally of, and shall be notified in writing in their preferred language of, the regional center’s or the state-operated facility’s appeals procedures for informal meetings,
 mediations, and fair hearings when they apply for service, when they are denied service, when notice of service modification is given pursuant to Section 4710, and upon request.

(d) If, in the opinion of any person, the rights or interests of a claimant who has not personally authorized a representative will not be properly protected or advocated, the State Council on Developmental Disabilities and the clients’ right advocate assigned to the regional center or state-operated facility shall be notified, and the State Council on Developmental Disabilities may appoint a person or agency as representative, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4541, to assist the claimant in the mediation and fair hearing procedure. The appointment shall be in writing to the authorized representative and a copy of the appointment shall be immediately mailed to the regional center director or the state-operated facility director.

(e) This section shall become operative on March 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 31) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 32.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Operative March 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4705.5.

(a) Unless the claimant is themselves an attorney licensed to practice law in California, or unless the claimant will have an attorney licensed to practice law in California in attendance, a regional center attorney or department attorney shall not attend an informal meeting, mediation, or fair hearing described in this chapter. The claimant shall notify the regional center and the hearing office at least 5 days prior to mediation, and 15 days prior to a fair hearing, that the claimant will have an attorney in attendance. However, the hearing officer may notify the parties in advance of a hearing that the hearing officer is allowing the attendance of an attorney in the interest of justice.

(b) This section shall become operative on October 1,
 2022.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 33.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Operative October 1, 2022, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4706.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) to the extent permitted by federal law, all issues concerning the rights of persons with developmental disabilities to receive services under this division shall be decided under this chapter, including those issues related to fair hearings, granted by the Medicaid home and community-services waiver to the State Department of Health Care Services.

(b) Whenever a fair hearing under this chapter involves services provided under the Medicaid home and community-based services waiver, the State Department of Health Care Services shall retain the right, as provided in Section 4712.5, to review and modify any decision reached under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 34.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4707.

(a) The following appeals processes shall be available for resolving conflicts between regional centers or state-operated facilities and recipients of, or applicants for, services under this chapter.

(1) An informal meeting held by the regional center or state-operated facility to resolve the issue or issues as provided for in Sections 4710.6 to 4710.9, inclusive.

(2) Mediation as provided for in Section 4711.5.

(3) A fair hearing as provided for in Sections 4711 and 4712.

(b) When filing an appeal, a claimant may initially request one or more parts of the
 appeals processes identified in subdivision (a). The claimant may subsequently amend their request to select parts of the appeals process not previously selected. However, that request shall constitute a waiver of the rights of a Medicaid home and community-based services waiver participant to receive a fair hearing decision within 90 days of the date that the appeal request form is received by the department or the agency it designates to receive the appeal request form.

(c) If a recipient’s request for an appeal is postmarked or received by the department, or by another agency designated by the department to receive the appeal request, no later than 30 days after receipt of the notice of the proposed action and no later than the effective date of the action sent pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4710, current services shall continue for the length of time specified in Section 4715, and the recipient shall be afforded an opportunity for
 an informal meeting, a mediation, and a fair hearing.

(d) If a recipient or applicant’s request for appeal is postmarked or received by the department, or by another agency designated by the department to receive the appeal request, 60 days after receipt of the notice of proposed action pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), and (d) of Section 4710, they shall be afforded an opportunity for an informal meeting, a mediation, and a fair hearing.

(e) A claimant may request a continuance of any part of the appeals process. If granted, the continuance shall constitute a waiver of the Medicaid home and community-based services waiver participant’s right to receive a fair hearing decision within 90 days of the date the appeal request form is received by the department or by the agency designated by the department to receive the appeal request form. The extension of time for the final
 decision resulting from the continuance shall be only as long as the time period of the continuance.

(f) This section shall become operative on March 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 35) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 36.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Operative March 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4708.

(a) (1) The department shall create, with input from stakeholders, standard appeals process information packets. There shall be one information packet related to appeals under the California Early Intervention Services Act (Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code) and another information packet related to appeals under the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500)). The appeals process information packets shall include all information required by this chapter and by Section 52161 and Sections 52170 to 52174, inclusive, of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, and shall include the appeal request form.

(2) The appeals process information
 packets shall be translated to provide language access, as required by state and federal law, and shall be available in alternative formats and alternative modes of communication as required by state and federal law.

(3) The appeals process information packets shall be made available by regional centers and state-operated facilities to recipients and applicants at each regularly scheduled planning meeting and with all notices of action required by Section 4710. Upon request, the department and the regional center shall provide the information packet to applicants, recipients, and authorized representatives. The department and regional centers shall post a link to the standard appeals process information packets on their internet websites within 60 days of the department making the information packets available.

(b) The standard appeals process information packets required by this
 section shall be completed by the department, including translations and alternative formats, and following consultation with stakeholders, on or before March 1, 2023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 37.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Fair Hearing Procedure [4710. - 4714.]

4710.

(a) The regional center or state-operated facility shall send adequate notice, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 4701, to the recipient and, if appropriate, the authorized representative, by standard mail, certified mail, or email at their preference as indicated in their individual program plan. This notice shall be sent at least 30 days prior to either of the following actions and shall specify the effective date of the action:

(1) The regional center or state-operated facility makes a decision to reduce, terminate, or change services set forth in an individual program plan, unless there is mutual consent as defined in subdivision (k) of Section 4701.

(2) A recipient is
 determined to be no longer eligible for regional center services.

(b) The regional center or state-operated facility shall send adequate notice, as described in Section 4701, no more than five business days after it makes a decision to deny the initiation of a service or support requested for inclusion in the individual program plan unless there is mutual consent as defined in subdivision (k) of Section 4701. The notice shall be sent to the recipient and, if appropriate, the authorized representative, in their preferred language, by standard mail, certified mail, or by email at their preference as indicated in the individual program plan.

(c) If the reason for denial of services or modification of services in a recipient’s individual program plan is a lack of funds in the regional center budget, the regional center shall be the service agency responsible for giving adequate notice
 and participating in the appeals procedure under this chapter.

(d) (1) The regional center shall, within 30 days after written notice is sent to the applicant or client, notify the department in writing of the denial if a lack of funds in the regional center budget is the reason for one of the following:

(A) The denial of services to an applicant.

(B) The denial of services to a current regional center client requesting services not included in the client’s individual program plan but determined to be necessary by the interdisciplinary team.

(C) Denial, cutback, or termination of current services to a recipient set forth in the individual program plan.

(2) The
 notification to the department shall include the nature of the service requested, a request that the department allocate sufficient funds to the regional center within 30 days to provide the service, the projected cost for the service for the balance of the fiscal year, and information substantiating the reason for the lack of funds to purchase the service.

(e) If a person requests regional center services and is found to be ineligible for these services, the regional center shall give adequate notice pursuant to Section 4701. Within five business days of the time limits set forth in Sections 4642 and 4643, notice shall be sent to the applicant and, if appropriate, the authorized representative, by standard mail, certified mail, or email at their preference as indicated at the time of intake.

(f) The advance notice specified in subdivision (a) shall not be required when a
 reduction, termination, or change in services is determined to be necessary for the health and safety of the recipient. However, adequate notice shall be given within 10 days after the regional center or state-operated facility action.

(g) This section shall become operative on March 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 38) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 39.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Operative March 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4710.5.

(a) Any applicant for or recipient of services, or authorized representative of the applicant or recipient, who is dissatisfied with a decision or action of the regional center or state-operated facility under this division shall, upon filing a request within 60 days after notification of that decision or action, be afforded an opportunity for an informal meeting, a mediation, and a fair hearing.

(b) The request for an informal meeting, mediation, or a fair hearing, or any combination thereof, shall be stated in writing on the appeal request form prescribed by the department.

(c) If any person makes a request for an informal meeting, mediation, or a fair hearing other than on the
 appeal request form, the employee of the regional center, department, or the state-operated facility who learns of the request shall provide the person with the appeal request form prescribed by the department and shall assist the person in filling out the form if the person requires or requests assistance. Any employee who willfully fails to comply with this requirement shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(d) The appeal request form shall be sent to the department unless the department has designated another agency to receive the form. The department or another agency that has been designated to receive the appeal request form shall send an electronic copy of a hearing request to the hearing office and the regional center or state-operated facility responsible for the action described in subdivision (a) within one business day of the department’s or designated agency’s receipt of the request. The department shall maintain information regarding
 all hearing request forms.

(e) This section shall become operative on March 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 40) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 41.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Operative March 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4710.6.

(a) (1) Upon receipt of an appeal request form requesting an informal meeting, the regional center or state-operated facility and the claimant shall determine a mutually agreed-upon date, time, and place for the meeting to be held, which shall be within 10 days of the date the department, or another agency designated by the department, receives the request, or unless the claimant requests a continuance.

(2) A place pursuant to paragraph (1) may include an agreement of the parties to conduct the informal meeting by telephone, videoconference, or other electronic means.

(b) The regional center or state-operated facility shall notify the claimant and their
 authorized representative in writing and in their preferred language of the mutually agreed-upon date, time, and place for the informal meeting.

(c) A written notification of rights specified in Section 4701 shall be provided to the claimant unless the regional center or state-operated facility provided the required written notification of those rights with the notice required by Section 4710.

(d) This section shall become operative on March 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 42) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 43.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Operative March 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4710.7.

(a) The purpose of the informal meeting is to attempt to resolve the issue or issues that are the subject of the appeal request informally prior to a mediation or fair hearing.

(b) The informal meeting shall be conducted by the regional center or state-operated facility director or their designee. The regional center or state-operated facility director or their designee shall notify the applicant or recipient and their authorized representative of the decision from the informal meeting in writing within five days of the meeting.

(c) The written decision of the regional center or state-operated facility director or their designee shall:

(1) Identify the issues presented by the appeal.

(2) Rule on each issue identified.

(3) State the facts supporting each ruling.

(4) Identify the specific laws, regulations, and policies upon which each ruling is based.

(5) Be provided in the preferred language of the applicant or recipient, or their authorized representative.

(d) This section shall become operative on March 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 44) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 45.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Operative March 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4710.8.

(a) At an informal meeting, the claimant shall have the rights stated pursuant to Section 4701.

(b) An informal meeting shall be held consistent with Section 4710.6.

(c) An informal meeting shall be conducted in the English language. However, if the preferred language of the claimant or the authorized representative is not English, an interpreter shall be provided. Any cost of an interpreter shall be borne by the regional center or state-operated facility.

(d) This section shall become operative on March 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 46) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 47.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Operative March 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4710.9.

(a) If, after the informal meeting, the claimant or their authorized representative is satisfied with all or part of the decision of the regional center or state-operated facility, they shall withdraw the request for an appeal on the matter or matters that have been decided to their satisfaction. The decision of the regional center or state-operated facility shall go into effect 10 days after the receipt of the full or partial withdrawal of the request for an appeal on those matters. The regional center or state-operated facility shall immediately forward a copy of the full or partial withdrawal, including a copy of the written decision, to the department and to the hearing office.

(b) If the claimant or their authorized representative is
 dissatisfied with all or part of the decision of the regional center or state-operated facility, the regional center or state-operated facility shall immediately notify the department and the hearing office that the appeal request has not been withdrawn.

(c) (1) If a claimant or their authorized representative has not advised the regional center or state-operated facility whether they want to proceed to a mediation or fair hearing within three days of receiving the informal meeting decision, they may do so at a later date.

(2) A decision to proceed to a mediation or fair hearing that is made more than three days after receiving the informal meeting decision shall be considered a waiver of their Medicaid home and community-based services right to a hearing decision within 90 days of the date the original request was received by the department.

(3) Services provided pursuant to a recipient’s individual program plan during the appeal shall end as specified in Section 4715.

(4) Sixty days after receiving the informal meeting decision, the appeal shall be considered withdrawn if the claimant or their authorized representative has not advised the regional center or state-operated facility of their intent to proceed to a mediation or fair hearing.

(d) A recommendation for consolidation pursuant to Section 4712.2 to the hearing office may be made at this time.

(e) This section shall become operative on March 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 48) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 49.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Operative March 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4711.

(a) Upon receipt of an appeal request form requesting mediation or a fair hearing, the hearing office shall immediately notify the claimant and the claimant’s authorized representative, in their preferred language, and the regional center or state-operated facility director in writing of all the following information applicable to mediation and fair hearings:

(1) (A) The time, place, and date of the mediation or fair hearing, as applicable.

(B) A place pursuant to paragraph (1) may include an agreement of the parties, or an order by a hearing officer, following a finding of good cause, to conduct the mediation or hearing by telephone, videoconference, or other
 electronic means.

(2) The rights of the parties at the mediation or fair hearing pursuant to Section 4701 or 4711.5, as applicable.

(3) The availability of advocacy assistance pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 4701.

(4) As applicable, contact information for persons or offices to conduct mediation or fair hearings, and to receive requests for continuance or consolidation.

(5) The rights and responsibilities of the parties established pursuant to Sections 4711.5 and 4712.

(b) This section shall become operative on March 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 50) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 51.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Operative March 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4711.5.

(a) Upon receipt of an appeal request form requesting mediation, the hearing office shall promptly notify the claimant and their authorized representative, in their preferred language, and the regional center or state-operated facility, of the information applicable to mediation.

(b) (1) The mediation shall be held within 30 days of the date the appeal request form is received by the department or by another agency designated by the department to receive the appeal request form, or unless a continuance is requested and granted to the claimant at the discretion of the mediator.

(2) A continuance granted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall constitute a waiver of a
 Medicaid home and community-based services participant’s right to a decision within 90 days of the date the appeal request form is received by the department or by another agency designated by the department to receive the appeal request form. The extension of time for the final decision resulting from the continuance shall be only as long as the time period of the continuance.

(c) Mediation shall be conducted in an informal, nonadversarial manner, and shall incorporate the rights of the claimant contained in paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 4701.

(d) Mediators shall meet both of the following requirements:

(1) Familiarity with the provisions of this division and implementing regulations, and familiarity with the process of reconciling differences in a nonadversarial, informal manner.

(2) The person is not in the business of providing or supervising services provided to regional centers or to regional center applicants or recipients.

(e) During the course of the mediation, the mediator may meet separately with the participants to the mediation, and may speak with any party or parties confidentially in an attempt to assist the parties to reach a resolution that is acceptable to all parties.

(f) The mediator shall voluntarily disqualify themselves and withdraw from any case in which the mediator cannot be fair and impartial. Any party may request the disqualification of the mediator by filing an affidavit, prior to the mediation, stating the specific grounds upon which it is claimed that a fair and impartial mediation cannot be held. The issue shall be decided by the mediator.

(g) Either the regional center or state-operated facility or the claimant or their authorized representative may withdraw from mediation at any time after the conclusion of the first mediation session, as that time is established by the mediator, and proceed to a fair hearing, if a fair hearing has been requested by the claimant.

(h) This section shall become operative on March 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 52) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 53.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Operative March 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4711.7.

(a) If the issue or issues involved in the mediation are resolved or partially resolved to the satisfaction of both parties, the mediator shall prepare a written resolution. Agreement of the claimant or their authorized representative to the written resolution shall be accompanied by a withdrawal or partial withdrawal, in writing, of any fair hearing request. The written resolution shall go into effect 10 days after receipt of the claimant’s agreement to the written resolution. The mediator shall promptly forward a copy of the written resolution and any full or partial withdrawal of a fair hearing request to the hearing office.

(b) If the mediation fails to resolve an issue or issues to the satisfaction of the claimant, or their authorized
 representative, the matter shall, at the claimant’s request, proceed to a fair hearing with respect to the unresolved issue or issues as provided under this chapter.

(c) The mediator, after the conclusion of the mediation, shall promptly notify the hearing office, department, claimant and their authorized representative, and regional center of the outcome of the mediation and whether or not the claimant wants to proceed to a fair hearing. If the claimant or their authorized representative has not indicated whether they want to proceed to a fair hearing, the matter shall be taken off the calendar and continued until the time that the claimant requests a hearing or withdraws the hearing request. The continuance shall be considered a waiver of their Medicaid home- and community-based waiver services right to a hearing decision within 90 days of the date the original request was received by the department.

(d) Services provided pursuant to a recipient’s individual program plan during the appeal shall end as specified in Section 4715.

(e) Sixty days after the mediator’s notice of the outcome of the mediation, the appeal shall be considered withdrawn if the claimant or their authorized representative has not indicated their intent to proceed to a fair hearing.

(f) This section shall become operative on March 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 54) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 55.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Operative March 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4712.
